Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-203
Board of trustees; qualifications.

Any person may be a trustee who is a citizen of the United States, resides in the village, and is a registered voter.

Laws 1879, § 42, p. 202;

Laws 1899, c. 13, § 1, p. 78;

R.S.1913, § 5053;

Laws 1915, c. 90, § 1, p. 230;

Laws 1921, c. 129, § 1, p. 539;

C.S.1922, § 4225;

C.S.1929, § 17-203;

R.S.1943, § 17-203;

Laws 1969, c. 257, § 10, p. 936;

Laws 1973, LB 559, § 4;

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 494.